North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116D. Higher Education Bonds.
Article 3. Special Obligation Bonds for Improvements to the Facilities of The University of North Carolina.

§ 116D-21.
Purpose.

The purpose of this Article is to authorize the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina to issue special obligation bonds, payable from obligated resources, but with no pledge of taxes or the faith and credit of the State or any agency or political subdivision of the State, to pay the cost, in whole or in part, of improvements to the facilities of the University.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

Editor’s Note.

As to the interpretation and implementation of the Michael K. Hooker Higher Education Facilities Financing Act, Session Laws 2000-3, see the Editor’s Note under

G.S. 116D-1

.

Session Laws 2008-204, ss. 1.1 through 1.9, authorizes construction of specified improvement projects at University of North Carolina constituent institutions and the funding therefore.

Session Laws 2008-204, s. 1.6, provides: “With respect to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill’s Research Resource Facility — Phase III capital project, East Carolina University’s Athletic Facilities Expansion and Improvements capital project, and North Carolina State University’s Avent Ferry Administration Center Renovation capital project, the institution may accomplish construction and financing notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location at the institution.”

Session Laws 2008-204, s. 1.9, provides: “With respect to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill’s Cogeneration and Steam Infrastructure Improvements and Expansion capital project, the institution may accomplish the construction and financing of the Landfill Gas Utilization portion thereof notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location of the special obligation project at the institution. The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill may enter into any other required agreements as necessary for the completion of the improvements, notwithstanding any other provisions of the General Statutes governing such acquisition, negotiation, and execution of such rights-of-way, easements, leases, or other required agreements therefor.”

§ 116D-22.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Existing facilities. — Buildings and facilities then existing that generate income or receipts to the Board of Governors that are pledged, under the provisions of a resolution authorizing the issuance of the special obligation bonds under this Article, to the payment of the bonds.

Institution. — Each of the institutions enumerated in

G.S. 116-2

, and any affiliated institutions of the University, including, without limitation, the University of North Carolina Center for Public Media, the University of North Carolina Health Care System, the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics, and the North Carolina Arboretum.

Obligated resources. — Any sources of income or receipts of the Board of Governors or the institution at which a special obligation bond project is or will be located that are designated by the Board as the security and source of payment for bonds issued under this Article to finance a special obligation bond project, including, without limitation, any of the following:

Rents, charges, or fees to be derived by the Board of Governors or the institution from any activities conducted at the institution.

Earnings on the investment of the endowment fund of the institution at which a special obligation project will be located, to the extent that the use of the earnings will not violate any lawful condition placed by the donor upon the part of the endowment fund that generates the investment earnings.

Funds to be received under a contract or a grant agreement, including “overhead costs reimbursement” under a grant agreement, entered into by the Board of Governors or the institution to the extent the use of the funds is not restricted by the terms of the contract or grant agreement or the use of the funds as provided in this Article does not violate the restriction.

Funds appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors on behalf of a constituent institution for utilities of the institution that constitute energy savings as that term is defined in

G.S. 143-64.17

.Except as provided in sub-subdivision d. of this subdivision, obligated resources do not include funds appropriated to the Board of Governors or the institution from the General Fund by the General Assembly from funds derived from general tax and other revenues of the State, and obligated resources do not include tuition payment by students.

Special obligation bonds. — Bonds issued under this Article to finance the cost of a special obligation project, which bonds are secured by and payable from obligated resources designated by the Board of Governors at the time the issuance of the bonds is authorized in accordance with this Article.

Special obligation bond project. — Any capital facilities located or to be located at an institution for the purpose of carrying out the mission of that institution and designated specifically by the Board of Governors as a “special obligation bond project” for purposes of this Article. A special obligation bond project need not necessarily consist of buildings or facilities that are expected to generate “self-liquidating revenues” to the Board of Governors or the institution from direct rentals, charges, or fees from the services provided by the building or facility, and may include facilities such as classroom buildings, administration buildings, research facilities, libraries, and equipment that do not produce direct, or indirect, income to the Board of Governors or the institution.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2; 2011-145, s. 9.6D(h); 2019-139, s. 2.1(d).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2005-324, s. 7, provides: “With respect to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill’s Water Reclamation and Reuse Infrastructure capital project and Research Resource Facility capital project, the institution may accomplish construction and financing notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location at the institution and may accomplish the project either through (i) direct ownership of the project or (ii) purchase of capacity in the project from the Orange Water and Sewer Authority.”

Session Laws 2005-324, s. 8, provides: “With respect to the project at Winston-Salem State University for the Bowman Gray Stadium Field House — Expansion and Renovation, the institution may accomplish construction and financing notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location at the institution and either through (i) direct ownership of the project, or (ii) by participation in a long-term agreement with the City of Winston-Salem.”

Session Laws 2006-146, s. 1.6, provides: “With respect to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill’s Research Resources Facility capital project, the institution may accomplish construction and financing notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location at the institution.”

Session Laws 2008-204, s. 1.6, provides: “With respect to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill’s Research Resource Facility — Phase III capital project, East Carolina University’s Athletic Facilities Expansion and Improvements capital project, and North Carolina State University’s Avent Ferry Administration Center Renovation capital project, the institution may accomplish construction and financing notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location at the institution.”

Session Laws 2008-204, s. 1.9, provides: “With respect to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill’s Cogeneration and Steam Infrastructure Improvements and Expansion capital project, the institution may accomplish the construction and financing of the Landfill Gas Utilization portion thereof notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location of the special obligation project at the institution. The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill may enter into any other required agreements as necessary for the completion of the improvements, notwithstanding any other provisions of the General Statutes governing such acquisition, negotiation, and execution of such rights-of-way, easements, leases, or other required agreements therefor.”

Session Laws 2012-164, s. 6, provides: “With respect to UNC-Chapel Hill’s Chilled Water Infrastructure Improvements capital project, the institution may accomplish construction and financing notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location at the institution and may accomplish the project either through (i) direct ownership of the project or (ii) an arrangement with Orange Water and Sewer Authority.”

Session Laws 2013-394, s. 5(a), provides: “With respect to Winston-Salem State University’s Bowman Gray & Civitan Park Acquisition project, the institution may accomplish construction, acquisition, and financing notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location at the institution and either through direct ownership of the project or by participation in a long-term agreement with the City of Winston-Salem if the property that is the subject of the project is a stadium that supports a NASCAR-sanctioned one-fourth mile asphalt flat oval short track and if all of the following requirements are met:

“(1) The stadium is not renamed.

“(2) No parking fees are charged for racing events at the stadium, the amount of public parking remains at or greater than the current level, and replacement parking, if any, is located on property adjacent to current parking areas.

“(3) No prohibitions are placed on spectators of racing events at the stadium that would prohibit the spectators from entering with food, nonalcoholic beverages, or both. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit regulations on containers that are imposed on the grounds that the regulations are necessary for public safety.

“(4) Where the property is subject to a lease at the time of acquisition, the lease provides for or is modified contemporaneously to provide for (i) a dispute resolution process, including the use of a committee, to resolve any disagreement between lessor and lessee, (ii) a process for accountability by the parties and recourse for the failure of the parties to perform any obligations or requirements included in the lease, and (iii) a prohibition against modification to co-located facilities that would adversely and materially impact race safety, operations, and costs, provided that the co-located facilities are football facilities.

“(5) Where the property is subject to a lease at the time of acquisition, the lease is for or is modified contemporaneously to be for a term of 30 years from the date of execution. If a modification to the lease term is required, the term of the lease may be extended up to 10 years notwithstanding any other provision of law.

“(6) The property continues to be made available, notwithstanding any other provision of law, for racing and racing-related events in a manner consistent with and under terms similar to those agreed upon for the use of the property immediately prior to the acquisition.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 9.6D(h), effective July 1, 2011, added subdivision (3)d.; and added the exception at the beginning of the last paragraph in subdivision (3).

Session Laws 2019-139, s. 2.1(d), effective July 19, 2019, substituted “Media” for “Television” in subdivision (2).

§ 116D-23.
Credit and taxing power of State not pledged; statement on face of bonds.

Special obligation bonds issued under this Article shall not constitute a debt or liability of the State or any political subdivision of the State or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any political subdivision of the State. Special obligation bonds shall be secured solely by the obligated resources pledged to their payment. All of the special obligation bonds shall contain on their face a statement to the effect that neither the State nor the Board of Governors is obligated to pay the bonds or the interest on the bonds except from the obligated resources pledged for payment and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any political subdivision or instrumentality of the State is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds. The issuance of special obligation bonds under this Article does not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the State or any political subdivision of the State to levy or to pledge any taxes for the bonds.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-24.
General powers of Board of Governors.

The Board of Governors is authorized, subject to the requirements of this Article, to do all of the following:

Determine the location and character of any special obligation bond project, to acquire, construct, and provide the project, and to maintain, repair, and operate and enter into contracts for the management, lease, use, or operation of all or any portion of any special obligation bond project and any existing facilities.

Issue special obligation bonds to pay all or any part of the cost of a special obligation bond project, and to fund or refund any bonds previously issued by the Board of Governors to finance facilities designated as a special obligation bond project.

Fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect fees, rates, rents, charges, and other income for the use of and for the services furnished by the institution that are designated as obligated resources in connection with a special obligation bond issue.

Establish and enforce, and to agree through any resolution or trust agreement authorizing or securing bonds under this Article to make and enforce, rules for the use of and services rendered by the institution of the income or receipts to be obtained from the use or services designated as obligated resources in connection with a special obligation bond issue.

Acquire, hold, lease, and dispose of real and personal property in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties and to lease all or any part of a special obligation bond project and any existing facilities for any periods of years, not exceeding 40 years, upon any terms and conditions as the Board of Governors determines, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 143-341

.

Employ consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and any other employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment in connection with a special obligation bond project and existing facilities, and to fix their compensation.

Enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this Article.

Receive and accept from any federal, State, or other public agency and any private agency, person, or other entity donations, loans, grants, aid, or contributions of any money, property, labor, or other things of value for a special obligation bond project or any other services provided by the institution that is designated as the obligated resource in connection with a special obligation bond issue, and to agree to apply and use them in accordance with the terms and conditions under which they are provided.

Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers granted by this Article.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-25.
Consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.

Whenever this Article requires the approval of the Director of the Budget of an action, the Director of the Budget may consult with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations before giving approval.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-26.
Issuance of special obligation bonds and bond anticipation notes.

Authority. — The Board of Governors may issue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, at one time or from time to time, special obligation bonds of the Board of Governors for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or providing a special obligation project. Before issuing special obligation bonds, the Board of Governors shall first adopt a resolution (i) setting forth the designation by the Board of Governors that the buildings or facilities to be financed by the bond issue are the special obligation bond project being financed and (ii) designating the obligated resources that will secure and be the source of payment of the special obligation bonds to be issued. The Board of Governors shall not issue any special obligation bonds unless the Board of Governors finds that sufficient obligated resources are reasonably expected to be available (i) to pay the principal and interest on the special obligation bonds proposed to be issued, (ii) to create and maintain any reserves for the payment of the special obligation bonds, to the extent the Board of Governors is required to maintain reserves for this purpose by the terms of the trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of the special obligation bonds, and (iii) to provide for the maintenance and operation of the facilities that are to generate the obligated resources to the extent the Board of Governors is required to maintain those facilities by the terms of the trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of the special obligation bonds. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the proceeds of special obligation bonds to be secured by obligated resources derived from the operation of or activities at one institution may not be applied to finance a special obligation project to be located at another institution.

Approval Required. — The Board of Governors shall not issue any special obligation bonds for a project at an institution unless the board of trustees of that institution has approved the issuance of bonds for that project. The Board of Governors shall not issue special obligation bonds under this Article until the effective date of legislation enacted by the General Assembly authorizing the undertaking of the special obligation bond project to be financed and fixing the maximum aggregate principal amount of special obligation bonds that shall be issued for that purpose. In submitting proposed special obligation bond projects to the General Assembly for approval, the Board of Governors shall submit information on the need for each project, project costs, estimates of increased operating costs upon completion, estimated debt service requirements, and the sources and amounts of obligated resources to be pledged for the repayment of the bonds. If the obligated resources to repay the bonds or to operate the proposed project potentially involve increased costs to students or to the General Fund, these costs shall be identified in the Board of Governors’ submission.Except as provided in this Article, special obligation bond projects may be undertaken, special obligation bonds may be issued, and other powers vested in the Board of Governors under this Article may be exercised by the Board without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the State and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this Article.

Term; Form. — The special obligation bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall mature at any times not exceeding 30 years from their dates, shall bear interest at any rates as may be determined by the Board of Governors, and may be redeemable before maturity at the option of the Board, at any prices and under any terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Board prior to the issuance of the special obligation bonds. The Board of Governors shall determine the form and manner of execution of the special obligation bonds and shall fix the denominations of the special obligation bonds and the places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the State. Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of this Article or any recitals in any special obligation bonds issued under the provisions of this Article, all special obligation bonds shall be negotiable instruments under the laws of this State, subject only to the provisions for registration in a resolution authorizing the issuance of the special obligation bonds or a trust agreement securing the bonds. The Board of Governors may sell the special obligation bonds in any manner, at public or private sale, and for any price, as it may determine to be for its best interests.

Proceeds; Additional Bonds. — The proceeds of the special obligation bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the purpose for which the bonds have been authorized and shall be disbursed in the manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the Board of Governors may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement securing them. Unless otherwise provided in the authorizing resolution or in the trust agreement securing the special obligation bonds, if the proceeds of the special obligation bonds, by error of estimates or otherwise, are less than the cost of the special obligation bond project, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of the deficit and shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose.The resolution providing for the issuance of special obligation bonds, and any trust agreement securing them, may also contain limitations upon the issuance of additional special obligation bonds as the Board of Governors considers proper, and the additional special obligation bonds must be issued under the restrictions and limitations prescribed by the resolution or trust agreement.

Temporary Bonds; Notes. — Before preparing definitive bonds, the Board of Governors may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds have been executed and are available for delivery. The Board may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which become mutilated, destroyed, or lost.The Board of Governors may enter into or negotiate a note with an acceptable bank or trust company in lieu of issuing special obligation bonds for the financing of special obligation bond projects covered under this Article. The terms and conditions of any note of this nature shall be in accordance with the terms and conditions surrounding issuance of the special obligation bonds.

Bond Anticipation Notes. — The Board of Governors may issue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, at one time or from time to time, bond anticipation notes of the Board of Governors in anticipation of the issuance of special obligation bonds authorized by this Article. The principal of and the interest on these notes shall be payable solely from the proceeds of special obligation bonds or renewal notes or, in the event bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, from the obligated resources designated for their payment. The notes of each issue shall be dated, shall mature at any times not exceeding 30 years from their dates, shall bear interest at any rates as may be determined by the Board of Governors, and may be redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Board of Governors, at any prices and under any terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Board of Governors prior to the issuance of the notes. If the Board of Governors issues a bond anticipation note for a term in excess of three years, no individual project may be funded from the proceeds of the note for longer than three years. The Board shall determine the form and the manner of execution of the notes and shall fix the denominations of the notes and the places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the State. Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of this Article or any recitals in any notes issued under the provisions of this Article, all notes shall be negotiable instruments under the laws of this State, subject only to the provisions for registration in a resolution authorizing the issuance of the notes or any trust agreement securing the bonds in anticipation of which the notes are being issued. The Board of Governors may sell the notes in any manner, at public or private sale, and for any price, as it may determine to be for its best interests.The proceeds of the notes shall be used solely for the purpose for which the special obligation bonds have been authorized, and the note proceeds shall be disbursed in any manner and under any restrictions as the Board of Governors may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the notes or bonds or in the trust agreement securing the special obligation bonds.The resolution providing for the issuance of notes, and any trust agreement securing the special obligation bonds in anticipation of which the notes are being authorized, may also contain limitations upon the issuance of additional notes as the Board of Governors considers proper, and such additional notes shall be issued under the restrictions and limitations prescribed by the resolution or trust agreement. The Board may also provide for the replacement of any notes which shall become mutilated, destroyed, or lost.Except as provided in this Article, notes may be issued under this Article and other powers vested in the Board of Governors under this Article may be exercised by the Board without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the State and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this Article.Unless the context indicates otherwise, the word “bonds”, wherever used in this Article, include the words “bond anticipation notes.”

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2; 2003-357, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2017-141, s. 3, provides: “Notwithstanding the term and maturity limitations for notes contained in

G.S. 116D-26(c)

, Elizabeth City State University may participate in the United States Department of Agriculture’s Community Facilities Direct Loan Program or Loan Guaranty Program.”

Session Laws
2017-141, s. 5, provides: “Pursuant to

G.S. 116D-26

, the Board of Governors may issue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, at one time or from time to time, special obligation bonds of the Board of Governors for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or providing for the projects authorized by Section 2 of this act. The maximum principal amount of bonds to be issued shall not exceed the specified project costs in Section 2 of this act plus five percent (5%) of such amount to pay issuance expenses, fund reserve funds, pay capitalized interest, and pay other related additional costs, plus any increase in the specific project costs authorized by the Director of the Budget pursuant to Section 4 of this act.” For similar provisions, see Session Laws
2002-173, s. 5; Session Laws
2006-146, s. 1.5; Session Laws
2009-540, s. 4; Session Laws
2010-172, s. 6; Session Laws
2011-145, s. 30.7(e); Session Laws
2012-164, s. 5; Session Laws
2013-394, s. 4; Session Laws
2014-60, s. 4; Session Laws
2015-275, s. 4; and Session Laws
2016-97, s. 4.

Session Laws
2019-124, s. 4, provides: “Pursuant to

G.S. 116D-26

, the Board of Governors may issue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, at one time or from time to time, special obligation bonds of the Board of Governors for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or providing for the projects authorized by Section 2 of this act. The maximum principal amount of bonds to be issued shall not exceed the specified project costs in Section 2 of this act plus five percent (5%) of such amount to pay issuance expenses, fund reserve funds, pay capitalized interest, and pay other related additional costs plus any increase in the specific project costs authorized by the Director of the Budget pursuant to Section 3 of this act.” For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2002-173, s. 5; Session Laws
2006-146, s. 1.5; Session Laws
2009-540, s. 4; Session Laws
2010-172, s. 6; Session Laws
2011-145, s. 30.7(e); Session Laws
2012-164, s. 5; Session Laws
2013-394, s. 4; Session Laws
2014-60, s. 4; Session Laws
2015-275, s. 4; Session Laws
2016-97, s. 4, and Session Laws
2017-141, s. 5.

Session Laws
2020-66, s. 4, provides: “Pursuant to

G.S. 116D-26

, the Board of Governors may issue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, at one time or from time to time, special obligation bonds of the Board of Governors for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or providing for the projects authorized by Section 2 of this act. The maximum principal amount of bonds to be issued shall not exceed the specified project costs in Section 2 of this act plus five percent (5%) of such amount to pay issuance expenses, fund reserve funds, pay capitalized interest, and pay other related additional costs plus any increase in the specific project costs authorized by the Director of the Budget pursuant to Section 3 of this act.”

Session Laws
2021-74, ss. 1-4, provides: “SECTION 1. The purpose of this act is to authorize (i) the acquisition or construction of the capital improvement projects listed in this act for the respective institutions of The University of North Carolina and (ii) the financing of these projects with funds available to the institutions from gifts, grants, receipts, self-liquidating indebtedness, Medicare reimbursements for education costs, hospital receipts from patient care, or other funds, or any combination of these funds, but not including funds received for tuition or appropriated from the General Fund of the State unless previously authorized by General Statute.

“SECTION 2. The capital improvement projects, and their respective costs, authorized by this act to be acquired or constructed and financed as provided in Section 1 of this act, including by revenue bonds, by special obligation bonds as authorized in Section 4 of this act, or by both, are as follows:

University of North Carolina at Greensboro The Arts Place at Tate and Gate $10,330,306 University of North Carolina at Wilmington Walton Drive Student Village —Recreation Fields and Facilities $9,750,000

Click to view

“SECTION 3.
At the request of the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and upon determining that it is in the best interest of the State to do so, the Director of the Budget may authorize an increase or decrease in the cost of, or a change in the method of, funding the projects authorized by this act. In determining whether to authorize a change in cost or funding, the Director of the Budget may consult with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.

“SECTION 4.
Pursuant to

G.S. 116D-26

, the Board of Governors may issue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, at one time or from time to time, special obligation bonds of the Board of Governors for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or providing for the projects authorized by Section 2 of this act. The maximum principal amount of bonds to be issued shall not exceed the specified project costs in Section 2 of this act plus five percent (5%) of such amount to pay issuance expenses, fund reserve funds, pay capitalized interest, and pay other related additional costs, plus any increase in the specific project costs authorized by the Director of the Budget pursuant to Section 3 of this act.”

§ 116D-27.
Trust agreement; money received deemed trust funds; insurance; remedies.

Trust Agreement Securing Bonds. — In the discretion of the Board of Governors and subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, any special obligation bonds issued under this Article may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the Board of Governors and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the State. The trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of special obligation bonds may pledge or assign the obligated resources designated as security for the special obligation bonds, but shall not convey or mortgage any property of the institution. The trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of special obligation bonds may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of the special obligation bonds that are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Board of Governors in relation to the acquisition, construction, or provision of any of the charging and collecting of any rates, fees, or charges that have been designated as obligated resources, the maintenance, repair, operation, and insurance of any property of the institution, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the State which may act as depositary of the proceeds of special obligation bonds or funds securing special obligation bonds to furnish any indemnifying bonds or to pledge any securities as may be required by the Board of Governors. A trust agreement or resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of the special obligation bonds and the rights, remedies, and immunities of the trustee or trustees, if any, and may restrict the individual right of action by the holders. In addition to the foregoing, a trust agreement or resolution may contain other provisions the Board of Governors considers reasonable and proper for the security of the holders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the special obligation bond projects for which the special obligation bonds are issued or as an expense of operation of the special obligation bond project.

Trust Funds. — All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Article, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds, or as obligated resources, are trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this Article. The Board of Governors may provide for the payment of all or part of the proceeds of the sale of the special obligation bonds and the obligated resources to any officer, board, or depositary that it may designate for their custody, and may provide for their method of disbursement, with any safeguards and restrictions it may determine. Any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of the moneys and shall hold and apply them for the purposes of this Article, subject to any requirements provided in this Article and in the resolution or trust agreement, authorizing or securing the special obligation bonds.

Insurance. — Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the Board of Governors may carry insurance on any special obligation bond projects and any existing facilities in any amounts and covering any risks it considers advisable.

Remedies. — Any holder of special obligation bonds issued under this Article and the trustees under a trust agreement, except to the extent the rights given in this section may be restricted by the trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of the special obligation bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State or granted under this Article or under the trust agreement or resolution, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this Article or by the trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the Board of Governors or by any of its officers, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of obligated resources.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.